Arkansas statutes. Title 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Chapter 8

Local Option

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

Cross References.

Enforcement of local option laws, §3-3-301 et seq.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1955, No. 15, § 4: Jan. 28, 1955. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas, under the present laws local option elections can be called and held at special elections; and, whereas these elections can be held on regular biennial general election days and thereby save the counties the expense of these elections; now, therefore it is determined by the General Assembly that an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

3-8-101. When elections held.

Local option elections to determine the legality or illegality of the manufacture, sale, bartering, loaning, or giving away of intoxicating liquors shall be held only on the regular biennial November general election days.

History.

Acts 1955, No. 15, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-824.

3-8-102. Effect of dry vote — Retail dealers — Definition.

(a)

Retail dealers in alcoholic beverages shall be allowed a period of sixty (60) days in which to dispose of stock after the final determination of the results of local option election by which the political subdivision in which the dealer is located shall have voted against the manufacture and sale of alcoholic beverages.

(b)

During the sixty-day period defined in subsection (a) of this section, the retailer may not purchase any alcoholic beverages, but must restrict his or her business to the sale of those items on hand as of the date the election results are finally determined.

(c)

As used in this section, “final determination” means the date of certification of the results of an uncontested election or, if contested, the date of the issuance of the mandate by the court finally determining an election contest.

History.

Acts 1957, No. 212, §§ 1-3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 48-826 — 48-828.

3-8-103. Effect of dry vote — Wholesalers and manufacturers.

(a)

It shall be lawful for any warehousing and office facility used by an authorized wholesaler of alcoholic beverages or manufacturing facility of a producer of native wines, or the manufacturing facility of a producer of beer, or the facilities of an alcoholic beverage distiller, blender, or rectifier, to continue in operation and to sell or give away, where previously authorized by law, such products in the facilities or existing restaurants appurtenant thereto, and utilized to promote the word-of-mouth advertising of such products, after the political subdivision in which such facility is located votes against the manufacture or sale of alcoholic beverages, provided that the facilities were in use or under construction for use prior to the filing of the petitions for local option election.

(b)

Sales from the establishment shall be limited to sales to authorized retailers or native wine wholesalers for resale in areas where the sale of alcoholic beverages is lawful.

History.

Acts 1961, No. 206, §§ 1, 2; 1965, No. 492, § 1; 1979, No. 145, § 1; 1979, No. 1056, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 48-829, 48-830.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1979, No. 1056, § 2, provided that § 1 of that act was amendatory to Initiated Act No. 1 of 1942, to the extent of permitting manufacturing facilities used to produce native wines or beer or to distill, blend, or rectify alcoholic beverages to continue to manufacture these products and to sell or serve the products produced at the facility to customers in any restaurant or other eating facility located on the premises in the event that the facility is located in an area which is voted dry in a local option election. However, the section further provided that this permission to continue business extended only to those facilities where the sale or service of the products was engaged in by the manufacturer at the time the initiated petitions calling for the local option election were filed.

Subchapter 2

— Proceedings Pursuant to Initiated Act

Publisher's Notes.

Initiated Act No. 1 of 1942 established a procedure for initiating and conducting local option elections which was different from that established in Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 7. Section 6 of the 1942 act specifically provided that the act was cumulative to the liquor laws then in force in the state.

Cross References.

Dry territories, §3-3-301 et seq.

Effective Dates.

Init. Meas. 1942, No. 1, § 8, Acts 1943, p. 998: Jan. 1, 1943.

Acts 1993, No. 826, § 5: Apr. 1, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that prior to the effective date of Act 418 of 1983, county clerks were not required by law to officially notify the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division of the results of local option contests; thus, the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division was required to rely upon unofficial information prior to the effective date of Act 418 of 1983; that immediate passage of this act is necessary to eliminate confusion regarding permits issued by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effective from and after the date of its passage and approval.”

3-8-201. Definition.

As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires, “intoxicating liquor” includes any beverage containing more than one-half of one percent (0.5%) of alcohol by weight.

History.

Init. Meas. 1942, No. 1, § 2, Acts 1943, p. 998; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-802.

3-8-202. Sections 3-8-201 — 3-8-203, 3-8-205 — 3-8-209 cumulative — Construction.

It is expressly declared that §§3-8-201 —3-8-203 and3-8-205 —3-8-209 shall be cumulative to the liquor laws now in force in this state. These sections shall at all times be construed so as to permit, upon petition of fifteen percent (15%) of the qualified electors in any area to be affected, the qualified voters therein at one (1) election to determine whether or not all alcoholic beverages, including all kinds and types of whiskey, beer, and wine, shall be manufactured or sold, bartered, loaned, or given away therein.

History.

Init. Meas. 1942, No. 1, § 6, Acts 1943, p. 998; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-806.

3-8-203. Applicability of §§ 3-8-201 — 3-8-203, 3-8-205 — 3-8-209.

Nothing in §§3-8-201 —3-8-203 and3-8-205 —3-8-209 is to be construed to affect manufacturers who sell their product exclusively to wholesalers.

History.

Init. Meas. 1942, No. 1, § 2, Acts 1943, p. 998; Acts 1985, No. 266, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-802.

3-8-204. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning petition procedure, was repealed by Acts 2013, No. 1432, § 1. The section was derived from Acts 1977, No. 341, §§ 1-3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 48-801.1 — 48-801.3; Acts 1997, No. 449, § 1.

3-8-205. Determination of sufficiency of petition — Calling of election.

(a)

If the petition is determined to be sufficient under §3-8-801 et seq., the county clerk shall certify that finding to the county board of election commissioners, and the question shall be placed on the ballot in the county, township, municipality, ward, or precinct at the next biennial general election as provided in §3-8-101.

(b)(1)

If an appeal is taken from the certification of the county clerk, it shall be taken within ten (10) days and shall be considered by the circuit court within ten (10) days, or as soon as practicable, after the appeal is lodged with the court.

(2)

The circuit court shall render its decision within thirty (30) days thereafter.

(c)

If an appeal is taken, the election shall be had no sooner than sixty-five (65) days after the appeal is determined, if the decision is in favor of the petitioners.

(d)(1)(A)

The decision shall be certified immediately to the county board of election commissioners, and the day for the election shall be fixed by the county board of election commissioners for not earlier than sixty-five (65) days nor later than ninety (90) days after the certification of the decision of the circuit court.

(B)

Any appeal from the final decision of the circuit court shall be taken within ten (10) days and shall be advanced and immediately determined by the Supreme Court.

(2)

In that event, the county board of election commissioners may, in its discretion, delay the election until after the final decision of the Supreme Court.

(3)

If the decision is in favor of the petitioners, then the county board of election commissioners shall set the day for the election, which shall be not earlier than sixty-five (65) days nor later than ninety (90) days after the final decision of the Supreme Court.

(e)

Except as provided in this section, a petition for local option election shall be governed by §7-9-101 et seq. and the Disclosure Act for Initiative Proceedings, §3-8-701 et seq.

History.

Init. Meas. 1942, No. 1, §§ 1, 4, Acts 1943, p. 998; Acts 1985, No. 266, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 48-801, 48-804; Acts 1993, No. 243, § 1; 1997, No. 449, § 2; 1999, No. 637, § 1; 2007, No. 1049, § 2; 2013, No. 1432, § 2; 2015, No. 1251, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment substituted “no sooner than sixty-five (65)” for “within thirty (30)” in (d); and in (e), substituted “sixty-five (65)” for “twenty (20)” and “ninety (90)” for “thirty (30)” in (1)(A) and (3).

The 2013 amendment added (f).

The 2015 amendment deleted former (a) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; and substituted “If the petition is determined to be sufficient under §3-8-801 et seq.” for “If it is found that thirty-eight percent (38%) of the qualified electors have signed the petition” in present (a).

3-8-206. Conduct of election.

(a)(1)

The county board of election commissioners of the particular county shall cause the question to be placed on the ballot at the general election in the following form:

“[ ] FOR the Manufacture or Sale of Intoxicating Liquors

[ ] AGAINST the Manufacture or Sale of Intoxicating Liquors”.

(2)

Each elector shall be instructed on the ballot to vote FOR or AGAINST the question by placing an appropriate mark.

(b)

The county board of election commissioners shall count the votes cast on the question of the manufacture and sale of alcoholic beverages in the designated area and shall deliver its certificate declaring the result of the election, together with the election returns, within three (3) days after the date of the election, to the county clerk of the county.

(c)

Upon petition of twenty-five (25) interested legal voters in the territory affected, within ten (10) days after the date of the election, the county board of election commissioners shall immediately recount the votes and declare the result of the election as determined by such recount.

(d)

Within twenty (20) days after the election, the county court shall make and have entered of record its order declaring the result of the election.

(e)

The costs of any elections held under the provisions of this subchapter shall be paid by the county in the same manner as other costs of general elections.

History.

Init. Meas. 1942, No. 1, § 2, Acts 1943, p. 998; Acts 1985, No. 266, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-802; Acts 1997, No. 449, § 3.

Cross References.

General election laws, §7-1-101 et seq.

3-8-207. Mandamus of county officials.

Upon petition of ten (10) interested legal voters in the territory affected, filed with the circuit clerk of the county in which proceedings are pending, the circuit court shall immediately by mandamus compel the county court or other officials to perform the duties imposed upon them under the provisions of this subchapter. The circuit court shall be open at all times for the purposes of this subchapter.

History.

Init. Meas. 1942, No. 1, § 5, Acts 1943, p. 998; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-805.

3-8-208. Election results — Effects.

(a)

If the majority of the electors voting on the issue at the election vote for the manufacture or sale of intoxicating liquors, then it shall be lawful for the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division to continue to issue licenses or permits for such manufacture or sale within the designated territory as if no election had been held.

(b)

If a majority of the electors voting at the election vote against the manufacture or sale of intoxicating liquors, then it shall be unlawful for the director or any county or municipal official to issue any license or permit for the manufacture, sale, barter, loan, or giving away of any intoxicating liquor as defined in this subchapter unless and until the prohibition shall be repealed by a majority vote as provided for in §§3-8-201 —3-8-203 and3-8-205 —3-8-209.

(c)

In either case, a period of at least four (4) years shall elapse before another election on the same subject may be held in the territory affected.

(d)

If a majority of electors voting on the issue at any such election vote against the manufacture or sale of intoxicating liquors, any license or permit which has already been issued, authorizing the manufacturing or sale or the bartering, loaning, or giving away of intoxicating liquor within the territory affected shall be immediately cancelled, and the unearned part of the license or permit fee shall be returned. It shall then be unlawful for any person, firm, or corporation to manufacture, sell, barter, loan, or give away any intoxicating liquor within the territory covered by the petition.

History.

Init. Meas. 1942, No. 1, § 2, Acts 1943, p. 998; Acts 1985, No. 266, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-802.

3-8-209. Sales or furnishing place for sale in dry territory prohibited — Penalty.

(a)

Except as provided in §3-5-1901 et seq., it is unlawful for a person, firm, or corporation to manufacture, sell, barter, loan, or give away intoxicating liquor in a county, township, municipality, ward, or precinct in which the manufacture or sale of intoxicating liquor is prohibited under Initiated Act No. 1 of 1942, §§3-8-201 —3-8-203 and3-8-205 —3-8-209.

(b)(1)

Upon a first conviction, any person or officers of any firm or corporation that shall manufacture, sell, barter, loan, or give away any intoxicating liquor in any territory which has been made dry under the provisions of this subchapter shall be guilty of a violation and shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(2)

For a second conviction, he or she shall be guilty of a violation and fined not less than two hundred dollars ($200) nor more than two thousand dollars ($2,000), and for any subsequent conviction shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

(c)

Any person or officers of a firm or corporation that knowingly furnishes or rents a house, room, wagon, vehicle, or any conveyance or thing in which intoxicating liquor is manufactured or sold, bartered, loaned, or given away in violation of prohibition secured under the provisions of this subchapter is declared to be a particeps criminis and upon conviction shall be subject to the same punishment as the principal. The house, room, wagon, vehicle, conveyance, or other thing in which the intoxicating liquor is manufactured or sold, bartered, loaned, or given away shall be liable for all fines adjudged against either the principal or the particeps criminis, or both, as defined in this subsection.

History.

Init. Meas. 1942, No. 1, § 3, Acts 1943, p. 998; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-803; Acts 2005, No. 1964, § 6; 2005, No. 1994, § 419; 2019, No. 681, § 2.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Pursuant to §1-2-207, this section is set out above as amended by Acts 2005, No. 1994. Subsection (b) of this section was also amended by Acts 2005, No. 1964, § 6, to read as follows:

“(b)

Any person who or officers of any firm or corporation which shall manufacture, sell, barter, loan, or give away any intoxicating liquor in any territory which has been made dry under the provisions of this subchapter shall, upon first conviction, be deemed guilty of a violation and shall be fined not less than four hundred dollars ($400) or more than four thousand dollars ($4,000). For a second conviction, he or she shall be fined not less than eight hundred dollars ($800) or more than eight thousand dollars ($8,000); and for any subsequent conviction shall be guilty of a felony and shall be sentenced to not less than one (1) year nor more than five (5) years in the Department of Corrections.”

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1993, No. 1258, § 5, provided:

“Arkansas Code §§3-8-209,3-8-311,3-8-312, and3-3-306 are repealed to the extent they conflict with this act.”

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment, in (b), substituted “guilty of a violation” for “deemed guilty of a misdemeanor,” and “he or she shall be guilty of a violation and fined” for “he shall be fined,” inserted “Class D” and deleted “and shall be sentenced to not less than one (1) year nor more than five (5) years in the Department of Corrections. If any person so convicted is punished by a fine only, if such fine is not paid immediately, he shall be confined in the Department of Corrections at hard labor until such fine and costs are paid at the rate of two dollars ($2.00) per day” from the end.

The 2019 amendment, in (a), substituted “Except as provided in §3-5-1901 et seq., it is” for “It shall be”, substituted “prohibited under” for “or shall be prohibited under the provisions of”; and made stylistic changes.

Cross References.

Wine tasting events, §3-5-104.

3-8-210. Authority to continue to issue sale permits.

The Alcoholic Beverage Control Division shall have the authority to continue to issue permits for the sale of beer and of vinous, spirituous, and malt liquors in any political subdivision of the State of Arkansas of the same kind and type issued prior to July 4, 1996, provided that the electorate of such political subdivision has not since July 4, 1996, held an election under the provisions of Initiated Act No. 1 of 1942, §§3-8-201 —3-8-203 and3-8-205 —3-8-209.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 826, § 1; 1999, No. 632, § 1.

Subchapter 3

— Proceedings Pursuant to 1935 Act

Publisher's Notes.

Initiated Act No. 1 of 1942 established a procedure for initiating and conducting local option elections which was different from that established in Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 7. Section 6 of the 1942 act specifically provided that the act was cumulative to the liquor laws then in force in the state. Additionally, in Denniston v. Riddle, 210 Ark. 1039, 199 S.W.2d 308 (1947), Acts 1935, No. 108, was referred to in the construction of an election held under Initiated Act No. 1 of 1942.

Cross References.

Dry territories, §3-3-301 et seq.

Sale, etc., in dry territory, §3-8-312.

Vinous, spirituous, and malt liquors defined, §3-1-102.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 10: approved Mar. 16, 1935. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas, the repeal of the Eighteenth Amendment to the Constitution of the United States has created an emergency which requires immediate control of intoxicating liquors; and

“Whereas, the present state revenue does not meet the needs for the maintenance and development of the State Government and its agencies and the state's credit is threatened with impairment, an emergency is declared to exist and this act shall become a law and be effective on its passage and approval or nonaction by the Governor.”

3-8-301. Exceptions from act.

The provisions of this act shall not apply to any manufacturer or wholesale dealer who, in good faith and in the usual course of trade, sells, by the wholesale, in quantities of not less than five gallons (5 gals.), delivered at one (1) time, not to be drunk on the premises. The provisions of this act shall not apply to dispensaries, hotels, restaurants, or clubs unless it is written in the petition, notice, and order for the election that provisions of this law and prohibition shall apply to dispensaries, hotels, restaurants, or clubs; if not so written, then licensed dispensaries, hotels, restaurants, or clubs may sell for medicinal purposes in the manner provided in this act.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 7, § 7; Pope's Dig., § 14153; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-813.

Meaning of “this act”.

Acts 1935, No. 108, codified as §§3-1-101 —3-1-103,3-2-101,3-2-205,3-3-101 —3-3-103,3-3-212,3-3-401,3-3-404,3-3-405,3-4-101 —3-4-103,3-4-201,3-4-202,3-4-207 —3-4-211,3-4-213,3-4-214,3-4-215 [repealed],3-4-217,3-4-219,3-4-220,3-4-301 —3-4-303,3-4-501,3-4-503,3-4-601 —3-4-605,3-8-301,3-8-302 [repealed],3-8-303,3-8-304 [repealed],3-8-305 —3-8-310,3-8-311 [repealed],3-8-313 —3-8-317,23-12-708.

3-8-302. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning petition and order for election, was repealed by Acts 2013, No. 1432, § 3. The section was derived from Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 7, § 1; Pope's Dig., § 14147; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-807.

3-8-303. Election costs deposited.

The county court shall not make the order for the election until the persons signing the petition have deposited with the county judge, in money, an amount sufficient to pay for printing or posting advertisements as provided for, and the fees of the clerk making entries in the order book.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 7, § 9; Pope's Dig., § 14156; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-815.

3-8-304. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning notice and conduct of election, was repealed by Acts 2013, No. 1432, § 4. The section was derived from Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 7, § 2; Pope's Dig., § 14148; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-808.

3-8-305. Elections for entire county, district, or city — Effect.

(a)(1)

No election in any town, city, district, or precinct of a county shall be held under this subchapter on the same day on which an election for the entire county is held.

(2)

When an election is held in an entire county and a majority of the legal votes cast at the election are against the sale, barter, or loan of spirituous, vinous, malt, or other intoxicating liquors, then it shall not be lawful to sell, barter, or loan any liquors in any portion of the county.

(3)

If, at an election for the entire county, the majority of the legal votes cast are in favor of the sale, barter, or loan of any liquors, the election shall not operate to make it legal to grant license to sell, barter, or loan such liquors in any territorial division of the county from which the sale, barter, or loan has been excluded by an election held under this subchapter, but the status of the territorial division shall remain as if no election had been held.

(b)(1)

No election shall be held in any election precinct under this act on the same day on which an election is held for the district or city of which the precinct is a part.

(2)

If, at an election held for the entire district or city, the majority of legal votes cast shall be in favor of the sale, barter, or loan of spirituous, vinous, malt, or other liquors, then the status in the several precincts thereof shall remain as it was before the election.

(3)

If the majority should be against the sale, then the sale, barter, or loan of such liquors shall be unlawful in every portion of the district or city.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 7, § 10; Pope's Dig., § 14157; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-816.

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to §3-8-301.

3-8-306. Certificate of election results.

(a)

If it shall be found that a majority of the legal votes cast at any election provided for in this subchapter were given for or against the manufacture, sale, barter, loan, or giving away of any intoxicating liquors in the county, city, town, district, or precinct, it shall be the duty of the county board of election commissioners to certify that fact. The certificate shall be delivered to the clerk of the county court with a map or plat of the area covered by the election results and safely kept by him or her until the next regular term of the county court.

(b)

At the next regular term, the judge of the county court shall have the certificate spread upon the record of his or her court.

(c)

The entry of the certificate in the record or a certified copy thereof shall be prima facie evidence in any or all proceedings under this act.

(d)

When the local option results have been spread of record by the county clerk, the county clerk shall notify the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division of the results of the local option elections within thirty (30) days after the certificate has been spread of record. The notification submitted to the division shall include a certified copy of the election results and a map or plat of the area covered by the election results.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 7, § 3; Pope's Dig., § 14149; Acts 1983, No. 418, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-809.

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to §3-8-301.

3-8-307. Effect of vote against sale.

If, at any election provided for in this act, a majority of the legal votes cast are against the sale, barter, or loan of spirituous, vinous, or malt liquors, then the sale, barter, or loan of any such liquors shall be unlawful in such county, city, town, district, or precinct, as the case may be, except as provided, unless at a subsequent election held under this act, a majority of the legal votes cast shall be in favor of the sale of the liquors.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 7, § 11; Pope's Dig., § 14158; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-817.

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to §3-8-301.

3-8-308. Applicability of election laws — Violations.

(a)

If, at any election provided for in this act, any person shall vote who is not entitled to vote under the laws of this state at elections for county officers, he or she shall be punished as for a violation of the general laws on elections.

(b)

All general laws to protect the purity of elections shall be applicable to this act.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 7, § 11; Pope's Dig., § 14158; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-817.

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to §3-8-301.

3-8-309. Contests of elections.

(a)

Any election held under this act may be contested as provided for in this section.

(b)(1)

Any number of the citizens and legal voters, but not less than ten (10), of the county, city, town, district, or precinct in which the elections have been held, shall have the right to contest any election held under this act and shall be designated the contestants.

(2)

The contestants shall file, within ten (10) days after the final action of the examining board, in the office of the clerk of the county court a written statement of the grounds of the contest. They shall cause a copy of the statement to be served on the county judge and shall give notice thereof by written or printed notice to be posted at the courthouse door of the county, and in three (3) or more public places in the county, city, town, district, or precinct in which the election has been held. They shall cause the notice to be published in some newspaper of the county, when possible, for two (2) consecutive issues, commencing not later than the first issue of the paper after filing the statement.

(3)

When a notice of the contest shall be executed on the county judge, the certificate shall not be recorded.

(c)

Any number of the citizens and legal voters, not less than ten (10), of the county, city, town, district, or precinct in which the election has been held, may resist the contest by filing in the office of the clerk of the county court a statement controverting the grounds of the contestants and may state any additional grounds to sustain the election, and they shall be designated as the contestees.

(d)

The contest shall be heard and determined by the same board which, by law, is authorized and empowered to hear and determine a contest of an election for county officers. The same provisions of the statutes shall apply to the contest of any election held under this act as are provided for the contest of any election for county officers, except as provided in this section.

(e)

Notice for the taking of depositions or other proceedings in the contest may be executed on the person whose name appears first as contestant or contestee, which shall be deemed notice to all his or her associates.

(f)

In case the required number shall fail to appear as contestees, ex parte testimony shall be competent before the contesting board.

(g)

The trial of the case shall be on the fourth Monday after the filing in the county clerk's office of the grounds of the contest; however, the board, for good cause, may allow further time.

(h)

The decision of the board shall be given in writing and signed in triplicate. One (1) copy shall be delivered to the contestants and one (1) copy to the contestees, and the other shall be delivered to the county clerk of the county in which the contest is pending, which shall be entered on the record of the county court.

(i)

If the decision of the board is that a majority of the legal votes cast at the election were against the sale of such liquors, the entry of the decision shall have the same effect as the recording of the certificates of the examining board as provided in §3-8-306.

(j)

The contestants or contestees shall have the right to appeal from the decision of the board to the circuit court of the county where the contest is pending, in the same way as appeals are taken from the lower courts to the circuit court. An appeal from the circuit court may be taken as provided by law.

(k)

The cost of the contest shall be adjudged against the unsuccessful parties.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 7, §§ 14-16; Pope's Dig., §§ 14161-14169; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 48-820 — 48-822.

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to §3-8-301.

3-8-310. Effect of voting for or against sale — Penalty for unlawful sales.

(a)(1)

Whenever a local option election shall be held in any county, city, town, district, or precinct in this state and a majority of the votes cast at the election shall be in favor of prohibiting the sale of liquor in the territory in which the election shall have been held, the law prohibiting the sale shall be in full force and effect at the expiration of sixty (60) days from the date of the entry of the certificate of the canvassing board in the record of the county court.

(2)

After the expiration of sixty (60) days, no liquor license theretofore issued in the territory under the laws of this state shall be of any force or effect whatever, but the owner of the license shall be entitled to recover from the county, city, town, district, or precinct to which the license money was paid, the proportional part thereof as the unexpired period of license bears to the whole of the year.

(b)(1)

Upon conviction, any person who shall sell, barter, or loan directly or indirectly any such liquors in the city, county, town, district, or precinct after sixty (60) days shall be guilty of a Class C misdemeanor.

(2)

Upon conviction, any person who knowingly furnishes or rents a house, room, wagon, or any conveyance or thing in which spirituous, vinous, or malt liquors are sold, bartered, or loaned, in violation of this act, shall be guilty of a violation and fined not less than sixty dollars ($60.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100). The house, wagon, vehicle, or other thing in which the liquors were sold, bartered, or loaned shall be liable for all fines adjudged against the person selling, bartering, or loaning the same.

(c)

In the event that a majority of the votes cast at the election shall be in favor of the sale of liquors, then no license shall be granted to any person, firm, or corporation to sell such liquors in the territory until after the expiration of the aforesaid sixty (60) days, if the issuing of the liquor license was in that territory prohibited by law prior to the holding of the election.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 7, § 4; Pope's Dig., § 14150; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-810; Acts 2005, No. 1964, § 7; 2005, No. 1994, § 406.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Pursuant to §1-2-207, this section is set out above as amended by Acts 2005, No. 1994. This section was also amended by Acts 2005, No. 1964, § 7, to read as follows:

“Effect of voting for or against sale.

(a)(1)

Whenever a local option election shall be held in any county, city, town, district, or precinct in this state and a majority of the votes cast at the election shall be in favor of prohibiting the sale of liquor in the territory in which the election shall have been held, the law prohibiting the sale shall be in full force and effect at the expiration of sixty (60) days from the date of the entry of the certificate of the canvassing board in the record of the county court.

“(2)

After the expiration of sixty (60) days, no liquor license previously issued in the territory under the laws of this state shall be of any force or effect, but the owner of the license shall be entitled to recover from the county, city, town, district, or precinct to which the license money was paid, the proportional part of the money as the unexpired period of license bears to the whole of the year.

“(b)

In the event that a majority of the votes cast at the local option election shall be in favor of the sale of liquors, then no license shall be granted to any person, firm, or corporation to sell the liquors in the territory until after the expiration of the sixty-day period under subsection (a) of this section, if the issuing of the liquor license was in that territory prohibited by law prior to the holding of the election.”

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment substituted “guilty of a Class C misdemeanor” for “fined not less than sixty dollars ($60.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) and be confined in the county jail for not less than twenty (20) nor more than forty (40) days for each offense” in (b)(1); and inserted “guilty of a violation and” in (b)(2).

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to §3-8-301.

3-8-311. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning the penalties for sale, barter or loan in dry territory, was repealed by Acts 2005, No. 1964, § 8. The section was derived from Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 7, §§ 5, 6; Pope's Dig., §§ 14151, 14152; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 48-811, 48-812.

The amendment to this section by Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 407 was superseded by the repeal of this section by Acts 2005, No. 1964, § 8. As amended by Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 407, this section read:

“(a)(1)

It shall be unlawful for anyone to sell, barter, or loan, directly or indirectly, any beverage containing any alcohol or any liquid mixture or decoction of any kind which produces or causes intoxication in any county, city, town, district, or precinct in which the sale, barter, or loan of spirituous, vinous, or malt liquors is or shall be prohibited in accordance with the local option law.

“(2)

Any sale, barter, or loan of any article with the agreement, expressed or implied, that the right or title to or possession of any such beverage, liquid mixture, or decoction shall also pass, shall be considered a sale, barter, or loan within the terms of this subsection.

“(3)

Any person who shall sell, barter, or loan, directly or indirectly, any such beverage, liquid mixture, or decoction in any such county, city, town, or precinct, shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a violation and fined the sum of not less than twenty dollars ($20.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) for each offense.

“(b)

It shall be unlawful for any person to sell, lend, give, procure for, or furnish to another, any spirituous, vinous, or malt liquors, or to have in his or her possession spirituous, vinous, or malt liquors, for the purpose of selling them in any territory where this act is in force. Any person so offending shall be guilty of a Class C misdemeanor.

“(c)

The possession of a United States special tax stamp commonly called United States license for carrying on the business of a retail dealer in spirituous, vinous, or malt liquors, or the having of the tax permit issued by the Director of the Department of Finance and Administration or license at the place of business in the territory shall be prima facie evidence of guilt under this section.

“(d)

Nothing herein shall prohibit the sale, barter, loan, or having in the custody or possession of any person any beverage, liquid mixture, or decoction for the sale of which the United States does not require the payment of the special tax on retail liquor dealers.”

3-8-312. Sale, barter, or possession for sale or barter in dry area — Penalties.

(a)

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, or corporation to sell or barter, or possess for purposes of sale or barter, any intoxicating liquor or beverage in any county, township, municipality, ward, or precinct in which the sale or barter of intoxicating liquor or beverage is or shall be prohibited by law.

(b)(1)

Upon first conviction, any person or officers of any firm or corporation that shall do so shall be guilty of a violation and shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(2)

The person or officers of a firm or corporation for a second conviction shall be guilty of a violation and fined not less than two hundred dollars ($200) nor more than two thousand dollars ($2,000).

(3)

For any subsequent conviction, the person or officers of a firm or corporation shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

(c)

The defendant shall be specifically charged with violating the felony provision of this section.

(d)

Bond forfeitures under this section or any statute or municipal ordinance of this state prohibiting the unlawful sale or barter or possession for sale or barter of any intoxicating liquor or beverage shall be considered as a conviction in determining whether or not the defendant is properly charged with a second offense or a felony as set out in this section.

History.

Acts 1953, No. 395, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-811.1; Acts 2005, No. 1964, § 9; 2005, No. 1994, § 420.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Pursuant to §1-2-207, this section is set out above as amended by Acts 2005, No. 1994. Subsection (b) of this section was also amended by Acts 2005, No. 1964, § 9, to read as follows:

“Any person, or officers of any firm or corporation, who violates subsection (a) of this section shall upon first conviction be deemed guilty of a violation and shall be fined not less than four hundred dollars ($400) or more than four thousand dollars ($4,000). The person or officers of a firm or corporation for a second conviction shall be fined not less than eight hundred dollars ($800) or more than eight thousand dollars ($8,000). For any subsequent conviction, the person or officers of a firm or corporation shall be deemed guilty of a felony and shall be sentenced to not less than one (1) year nor more than five (5) years in the Department of Corrections.”

Publisher's Notes.

This section may affect §§3-3-205(a) and3-3-301 et seq.

This section may be affected by §3-8-103.

Acts 1993, No. 1258, § 5, provided:

“Arkansas Code §§3-8-209,3-8-311,3-8-312, and3-3-306 are repealed to the extent they conflict with this act.”

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment substituted “violation” for “misdemeanor,” in (b)(1); inserted “guilty of a violation and” in (b)(2); inserted “Class D” and deleted “and shall be sentenced to not less than one (1) year nor more than five (5) years in the Department of Corrections” from the end.

Cross References.

Wine tasting events, §3-5-104.